Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.010

Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the "Juvenile Court Act in Cases Relating to Dependency of a Child and the Termination of a Parent and Child Relationship".

[ 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 29.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.